Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1355
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1355 to 71-1385 shall be known and may be cited as the Cremation of Human Remains Act.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB146, § 1.

Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act, see section 38-1401.